Illinois, session 104th, HB1140.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Sections 10-9, 11-9.3, and 11-25 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/10-9)7    Sec. 10-9. Trafficking in persons, involuntary servitude, 8and related offenses.9    (a) Definitions. In this Section:10    (1) "Intimidation" has the meaning prescribed in Section 1112-6.12    (2) "Commercial sexual activity" means any sex act on 13account of which anything of value is given, promised to, or 14received by any person. 15    (2.5) "Company" means any sole proprietorship, 16organization, association, corporation, partnership, joint 17venture, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, 18limited liability limited partnership, limited liability 19company, or other entity or business association, including 20all wholly owned subsidiaries, majority-owned subsidiaries, 21parent companies, or affiliates of those entities or business 22associations, that exist for the purpose of making profit. 23    (3) "Financial harm" includes intimidation that brings   HB1140- 2 -LRB104 04996 RLC 15024 b1about financial loss, criminal usury, or employment contracts 2that violate the Frauds Act.3    (4) (Blank).4    (5) "Labor" means work of economic or financial value.5    (6) "Maintain" means, in relation to labor or services, to 6secure continued performance thereof, regardless of any 7initial agreement on the part of the victim to perform that 8type of service.9    (7) "Obtain" means, in relation to labor or services, to 10secure performance thereof.11    (7.5) "Serious harm" means any harm, whether physical or 12nonphysical, including psychological, financial, or 13reputational harm, that is sufficiently serious, under all the 14surrounding circumstances, to compel a reasonable person of 15the same background and in the same circumstances to perform 16or to continue performing labor or services in order to avoid 17incurring that harm. 18    (8) "Services" means activities resulting from a 19relationship between a person and the actor in which the 20person performs activities under the supervision of or for the 21benefit of the actor. Commercial sexual activity and 22sexually-explicit performances are forms of activities that 23are "services" under this Section. Nothing in this definition 24may be construed to legitimize or legalize prostitution.25    (9) "Sexually-explicit performance" means a live, 26recorded, broadcast (including over the Internet), or public   HB1140- 3 -LRB104 04996 RLC 15024 b1act or show intended to arouse or satisfy the sexual desires or 2appeal to the prurient interests of patrons.3    (10) "Trafficking victim" means a person subjected to the 4practices set forth in subsection (b), (c), or (d).5    (b) Involuntary servitude. A person commits involuntary 6servitude when he or she knowingly subjects, attempts to 7subject, or engages in a conspiracy to subject another person 8to labor or services obtained or maintained through any of the 9following means, or any combination of these means: 10        (1) causes or threatens to cause physical harm to any 11    person;12        (2) physically restrains or threatens to physically 13    restrain another person;14        (3) abuses or threatens to abuse the law or legal 15    process;16        (4) knowingly destroys, conceals, removes, 17    confiscates, or possesses any actual or purported passport 18    or other immigration document, or any other actual or 19    purported government identification document, of another 20    person;21        (5) uses intimidation, or exerts financial control 22    over any person; or23        (6) uses any scheme, plan, or pattern intended to 24    cause the person to believe that, if the person did not 25    perform the labor or services, that person or another 26    person would suffer serious harm or physical restraint.   HB1140- 4 -LRB104 04996 RLC 15024 b1    Sentence. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) 2or (f), a violation of subsection (b)(1) is a Class X felony, 3(b)(2) is a Class 1 felony, (b)(3) is a Class 2 felony, (b)(4) 4is a Class 3 felony, (b)(5) and (b)(6) is a Class 4 felony. 5    (c) Involuntary sexual servitude of a minor. A person 6commits involuntary sexual servitude of a minor when he or she 7knowingly recruits, entices, harbors, transports, provides, or 8obtains by any means, or attempts to recruit, entice, harbor, 9provide, or obtain by any means, another person under 18 years 10of age, knowing that the minor will engage in commercial 11sexual activity, a sexually-explicit performance, or the 12production of pornography, or causes or attempts to cause a 13minor to engage in one or more of those activities and:14        (1) there is no overt force or threat and the minor is 15    between the ages of 17 and 18 years;16        (2) there is no overt force or threat and the minor is 17    under the age of 17 years; or18        (3) there is overt force or threat.19    Sentence. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) 20or (f), a violation of subsection (c)(1) is a Class 1 felony, 21(c)(2) is a Class X felony, and (c)(3) is a Class X felony. 22    (d) Trafficking in persons. A person commits trafficking 23in persons when he or she knowingly: (1) recruits, entices, 24harbors, transports, provides, or obtains by any means, or 25attempts to recruit, entice, harbor, transport, provide, or 26obtain by any means, another person, intending or knowing that   HB1140- 5 -LRB104 04996 RLC 15024 b1the person will be subjected to involuntary servitude; or (2) 2benefits, financially or by receiving anything of value, from 3participation in a venture that has engaged in an act of 4involuntary servitude or involuntary sexual servitude of a 5minor. A company commits trafficking in persons when the 6company knowingly benefits, financially or by receiving 7anything of value, from participation in a venture that has 8engaged in an act of involuntary servitude or involuntary 9sexual servitude of a minor.10    Sentence. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) 11or (f), a violation of this subsection by a person is a Class 1 12felony. A violation of this subsection by a company is a 13business offense for which a fine of up to $100,000 may be 14imposed.15    (e) Aggravating factors. A violation of this Section 16involving kidnapping or an attempt to kidnap, aggravated 17criminal sexual assault or an attempt to commit aggravated 18criminal sexual assault, or an attempt to commit first degree 19murder is a Class X felony. 20    (f) Sentencing considerations.21        (1) Bodily injury. If, pursuant to a violation of this 22    Section, a victim suffered bodily injury, the defendant 23    may be sentenced to an extended-term sentence under 24    Section 5-8-2 of the Unified Code of Corrections. The 25    sentencing court must take into account the time in which 26    the victim was held in servitude, with increased penalties   HB1140- 6 -LRB104 04996 RLC 15024 b1    for cases in which the victim was held for between 180 days 2    and one year, and increased penalties for cases in which 3    the victim was held for more than one year.4        (2) Number of victims. In determining sentences within 5    statutory maximums, the sentencing court should take into 6    account the number of victims, and may provide for 7    substantially increased sentences in cases involving more 8    than 10 victims.9    (g) Restitution. Restitution is mandatory under this 10Section. In addition to any other amount of loss identified, 11the court shall order restitution including the greater of (1) 12the gross income or value to the defendant of the victim's 13labor or services or (2) the value of the victim's labor as 14guaranteed under the Minimum Wage Law and overtime provisions 15of the Fair Labor Standards Act (FLSA) or the Minimum Wage Law, 16whichever is greater.17    (g-5) Fine distribution. If the court imposes a fine under 18subsection (b), (c), or (d) of this Section, it shall be 19collected and distributed to the Specialized Services for 20Survivors of Human Trafficking Fund in accordance with Section 215-9-1.21 of the Unified Code of Corrections. 22    (h) Trafficking victim services. Subject to the 23availability of funds, the Department of Human Services may 24provide or fund emergency services and assistance to 25individuals who are victims of one or more offenses defined in 26this Section.   HB1140- 7 -LRB104 04996 RLC 15024 b1    (i) Certification. The Attorney General, a State's 2Attorney, or any law enforcement official shall certify in 3writing to the United States Department of Justice or other 4federal agency, such as the United States Department of 5Homeland Security, that an investigation or prosecution under 6this Section has begun and the individual who is a likely 7victim of a crime described in this Section is willing to 8cooperate or is cooperating with the investigation to enable 9the individual, if eligible under federal law, to qualify for 10an appropriate special immigrant visa and to access available 11federal benefits. Cooperation with law enforcement shall not 12be required of victims of a crime described in this Section who 13are under 18 years of age. This certification shall be made 14available to the victim and his or her designated legal 15representative. 16    (j) A person who commits involuntary servitude, 17involuntary sexual servitude of a minor, or trafficking in 18persons under subsection (b), (c), or (d) of this Section is 19subject to the property forfeiture provisions set forth in 20Article 124B of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963. 21    (k) Prohibition of plea bargains.22        (1) No person charged with involuntary sexual 23    servitude of a minor or trafficking in persons if the 24    victim is under 18 years of age shall be permitted to plead 25    down to lesser offenses.26        (2) Prosecutors are prohibited from offering plea   HB1140- 8 -LRB104 04996 RLC 15024 b1    bargains to lesser offenses to those individuals charged 2    with involuntary sexual servitude of a minor or 3    trafficking in persons if the victim is under 18 years of 4    age. 5(Source: P.A. 101-18, eff. 1-1-20.) 6    (720 ILCS 5/11-9.3)7    Sec. 11-9.3. Presence within school zone by child sex 8offenders prohibited; approaching, contacting, residing with, 9or communicating with a child within certain places by child 10sex offenders prohibited.11    (a) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly be 12present in any school building, on real property comprising 13any school, or in any conveyance owned, leased, or contracted 14by a school to transport students to or from school or a school 15related activity when persons under the age of 18 are present 16in the building, on the grounds or in the conveyance, unless 17the offender is a parent or guardian of a student attending the 18school and the parent or guardian is: (i) attending a 19conference at the school with school personnel to discuss the 20progress of his or her child academically or socially, (ii) 21participating in child review conferences in which evaluation 22and placement decisions may be made with respect to his or her 23child regarding special education services, or (iii) attending 24conferences to discuss other student issues concerning his or 25her child such as retention and promotion and notifies the   HB1140- 9 -LRB104 04996 RLC 15024 b1principal of the school of his or her presence at the school or 2unless the offender has permission to be present from the 3superintendent or the school board or in the case of a private 4school from the principal. In the case of a public school, if 5permission is granted, the superintendent or school board 6president must inform the principal of the school where the 7sex offender will be present. Notification includes the nature 8of the sex offender's visit and the hours in which the sex 9offender will be present in the school. The sex offender is 10responsible for notifying the principal's office when he or 11she arrives on school property and when he or she departs from 12school property. If the sex offender is to be present in the 13vicinity of children, the sex offender has the duty to remain 14under the direct supervision of a school official.15    (a-5) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly 16be present within 100 feet of a site posted as a pick-up or 17discharge stop for a conveyance owned, leased, or contracted 18by a school to transport students to or from school or a school 19related activity when one or more persons under the age of 18 20are present at the site. 21    (a-10) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to 22knowingly be present in any public park building, a playground 23or recreation area within any publicly accessible privately 24owned building, or on real property comprising any public park 25when persons under the age of 18 are present in the building or 26on the grounds and to approach, contact, or communicate with a   HB1140- 10 -LRB104 04996 RLC 15024 b1child under 18 years of age, unless the offender is a parent or 2guardian of a person under 18 years of age present in the 3building or on the grounds. 4    (b) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly 5loiter within 500 feet of a school building or real property 6comprising any school while persons under the age of 18 are 7present in the building or on the grounds, unless the offender 8is a parent or guardian of a student attending the school and 9the parent or guardian is: (i) attending a conference at the 10school with school personnel to discuss the progress of his or 11her child academically or socially, (ii) participating in 12child review conferences in which evaluation and placement 13decisions may be made with respect to his or her child 14regarding special education services, or (iii) attending 15conferences to discuss other student issues concerning his or 16her child such as retention and promotion and notifies the 17principal of the school of his or her presence at the school or 18has permission to be present from the superintendent or the 19school board or in the case of a private school from the 20principal. In the case of a public school, if permission is 21granted, the superintendent or school board president must 22inform the principal of the school where the sex offender will 23be present. Notification includes the nature of the sex 24offender's visit and the hours in which the sex offender will 25be present in the school. The sex offender is responsible for 26notifying the principal's office when he or she arrives on   HB1140- 11 -LRB104 04996 RLC 15024 b1school property and when he or she departs from school 2property. If the sex offender is to be present in the vicinity 3of children, the sex offender has the duty to remain under the 4direct supervision of a school official.5    (b-2) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly 6loiter on a public way within 500 feet of a public park 7building or real property comprising any public park while 8persons under the age of 18 are present in the building or on 9the grounds and to approach, contact, or communicate with a 10child under 18 years of age, unless the offender is a parent or 11guardian of a person under 18 years of age present in the 12building or on the grounds. 13    (b-5) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly 14reside within 500 feet of a school building or the real 15property comprising any school that persons under the age of 1618 attend. Nothing in this subsection (b-5) prohibits a child 17sex offender from residing within 500 feet of a school 18building or the real property comprising any school that 19persons under 18 attend if the property is owned by the child 20sex offender and was purchased before July 7, 2000 (the 21effective date of Public Act 91-911).22    (b-10) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to 23knowingly reside within 500 feet of a playground, child care 24institution, day care center, part day child care facility, 25day care home, group day care home, or a facility providing 26programs or services exclusively directed toward persons under   HB1140- 12 -LRB104 04996 RLC 15024 b118 years of age. Nothing in this subsection (b-10) prohibits a 2child sex offender from residing within 500 feet of a 3playground or a facility providing programs or services 4exclusively directed toward persons under 18 years of age if 5the property is owned by the child sex offender and was 6purchased before July 7, 2000. Nothing in this subsection 7(b-10) prohibits a child sex offender from residing within 500 8feet of a child care institution, day care center, or part day 9child care facility if the property is owned by the child sex 10offender and was purchased before June 26, 2006. Nothing in 11this subsection (b-10) prohibits a child sex offender from 12residing within 500 feet of a day care home or group day care 13home if the property is owned by the child sex offender and was 14purchased before August 14, 2008 (the effective date of Public 15Act 95-821). 16    (b-15) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to 17knowingly reside within 500 feet of the victim of the sex 18offense. Nothing in this subsection (b-15) prohibits a child 19sex offender from residing within 500 feet of the victim if the 20property in which the child sex offender resides is owned by 21the child sex offender and was purchased before August 22, 222002. 23    This subsection (b-15) does not apply if the victim of the 24sex offense is 21 years of age or older. 25    (b-20) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to 26knowingly communicate, other than for a lawful purpose under   HB1140- 13 -LRB104 04996 RLC 15024 b1Illinois law, using the Internet or any other digital media, 2with a person under 18 years of age or with a person whom he or 3she believes to be a person under 18 years of age, unless the 4offender is a parent or guardian of the person under 18 years 5of age. 6    (c) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly 7operate, manage, be employed by, volunteer at, be associated 8with, or knowingly be present at any: (i) facility providing 9programs, or services, or entertainment exclusively directed 10toward persons under the age of 18; (ii) day care center; (iii) 11part day child care facility; (iv) child care institution; (v) 12school providing before and after school programs for children 13under 18 years of age; (vi) day care home; or (vii) group day 14care home. This does not prohibit a child sex offender from 15owning the real property upon which the programs or services 16are offered or upon which the day care center, part day child 17care facility, child care institution, or school providing 18before and after school programs for children under 18 years 19of age is located, provided the child sex offender refrains 20from being present on the premises for the hours during which: 21(1) the programs or services are being offered or (2) the day 22care center, part day child care facility, child care 23institution, or school providing before and after school 24programs for children under 18 years of age, day care home, or 25group day care home is operated. 26    (c-2) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to   HB1140- 14 -LRB104 04996 RLC 15024 b1participate in a holiday event involving children under 18 2years of age, including but not limited to distributing candy 3or other items to children on Halloween, wearing a Santa Claus 4costume on or preceding Christmas, being employed as a 5department store Santa Claus, or wearing an Easter Bunny 6costume on or preceding Easter. For the purposes of this 7subsection, child sex offender has the meaning as defined in 8this Section, but does not include as a sex offense under 9paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of this Section, the offense 10under subsection (c) of Section 11-1.50 of this Code. This 11subsection does not apply to a child sex offender who is a 12parent or guardian of children under 18 years of age that are 13present in the home and other non-familial minors are not 14present.15    (c-5) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly 16operate, manage, be employed by, or be associated with any 17carnival, amusement enterprise, or county or State fair when 18persons under the age of 18 are present. 19    (c-6) It is unlawful for a child sex offender who owns and 20resides at residential real estate to knowingly rent any 21residential unit within the same building in which he or she 22resides to a person who is the parent or guardian of a child or 23children under 18 years of age. This subsection shall apply 24only to leases or other rental arrangements entered into after 25January 1, 2009 (the effective date of Public Act 95-820).26    (c-7) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly   HB1140- 15 -LRB104 04996 RLC 15024 b1offer or provide any programs or services to persons under 18 2years of age in his or her residence or the residence of 3another or in any facility for the purpose of offering or 4providing such programs or services, whether such programs or 5services are offered or provided by contract, agreement, 6arrangement, or on a volunteer basis.7    (c-8) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly 8operate, whether authorized to do so or not, any of the 9following vehicles: (1) a vehicle which is specifically 10designed, constructed or modified and equipped to be used for 11the retail sale of food or beverages, including but not 12limited to an ice cream truck; (2) an authorized emergency 13vehicle; or (3) a rescue vehicle. 14    (d) Definitions. In this Section:15        (1) "Child sex offender" means any person who:16            (i) has been charged under Illinois law, or any 17        substantially similar federal law or law of another 18        state, with a sex offense set forth in paragraph (2) of 19        this subsection (d) or the attempt to commit an 20        included sex offense, and the victim is a person under 21        18 years of age at the time of the offense; and:22                (A) is convicted of such offense or an attempt 23            to commit such offense; or24                (B) is found not guilty by reason of insanity 25            of such offense or an attempt to commit such 26            offense; or  HB1140- 16 -LRB104 04996 RLC 15024 b1                (C) is found not guilty by reason of insanity 2            pursuant to subsection (c) of Section 104-25 of 3            the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 of such 4            offense or an attempt to commit such offense; or5                (D) is the subject of a finding not resulting 6            in an acquittal at a hearing conducted pursuant to 7            subsection (a) of Section 104-25 of the Code of 8            Criminal Procedure of 1963 for the alleged 9            commission or attempted commission of such 10            offense; or11                (E) is found not guilty by reason of insanity 12            following a hearing conducted pursuant to a 13            federal law or the law of another state 14            substantially similar to subsection (c) of Section 15            104-25 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 16            of such offense or of the attempted commission of 17            such offense; or18                (F) is the subject of a finding not resulting 19            in an acquittal at a hearing conducted pursuant to 20            a federal law or the law of another state 21            substantially similar to subsection (a) of Section 22            104-25 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 23            for the alleged violation or attempted commission 24            of such offense; or25            (ii) is certified as a sexually dangerous person 26        pursuant to the Illinois Sexually Dangerous Persons   HB1140- 17 -LRB104 04996 RLC 15024 b1        Act, or any substantially similar federal law or the 2        law of another state, when any conduct giving rise to 3        such certification is committed or attempted against a 4        person less than 18 years of age; or5            (iii) is subject to the provisions of Section 2 of 6        the Interstate Agreements on Sexually Dangerous 7        Persons Act.8        Convictions that result from or are connected with the 9    same act, or result from offenses committed at the same 10    time, shall be counted for the purpose of this Section as 11    one conviction. Any conviction set aside pursuant to law 12    is not a conviction for purposes of this Section.13        (2) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2.5), 14    "sex offense" means:15            (i) A violation of any of the following Sections 16        of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 17        2012: 10-4 (forcible detention), 10-7 (aiding or 18        abetting child abduction under Section 10-5(b)(10)), 19        10-5(b)(10) (child luring), 11-1.40 (predatory 20        criminal sexual assault of a child), 11-6 (indecent 21        solicitation of a child), 11-6.5 (indecent 22        solicitation of an adult), 11-9.1 (sexual exploitation 23        of a child), 11-9.2 (custodial sexual misconduct), 24        11-9.5 (sexual misconduct with a person with a 25        disability), 11-11 (sexual relations within families), 26        11-14.3(a)(1) (promoting prostitution by advancing   HB1140- 18 -LRB104 04996 RLC 15024 b1        prostitution), 11-14.3(a)(2)(A) (promoting 2        prostitution by profiting from prostitution by 3        compelling a person to be a prostitute), 4        11-14.3(a)(2)(C) (promoting prostitution by profiting 5        from prostitution by means other than as described in 6        subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (2) of 7        subsection (a) of Section 11-14.3), 11-14.4 (promoting 8        juvenile prostitution), 11-18.1 (patronizing a 9        juvenile prostitute), 11-20.1 (child pornography), 10        11-20.1B (aggravated child pornography), 11-21 11        (harmful material), 11-25 (grooming), 11-26 (traveling 12        to meet a minor or traveling to meet a child), 12-33 13        (ritualized abuse of a child), 11-20 (obscenity) (when 14        that offense was committed in any school, on real 15        property comprising any school, in any conveyance 16        owned, leased, or contracted by a school to transport 17        students to or from school or a school related 18        activity, or in a public park), 11-30 (public 19        indecency) (when committed in a school, on real 20        property comprising a school, in any conveyance owned, 21        leased, or contracted by a school to transport 22        students to or from school or a school related 23        activity, or in a public park). An attempt to commit 24        any of these offenses.25            (ii) A violation of any of the following Sections 26        of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of   HB1140- 19 -LRB104 04996 RLC 15024 b1        2012, when the victim is a person under 18 years of 2        age: 11-1.20 (criminal sexual assault), 11-1.30 3        (aggravated criminal sexual assault), 11-1.50 4        (criminal sexual abuse), 11-1.60 (aggravated criminal 5        sexual abuse). An attempt to commit any of these 6        offenses.7            (iii) A violation of any of the following Sections 8        of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 9        2012, when the victim is a person under 18 years of age 10        and the defendant is not a parent of the victim:11            10-1 (kidnapping),12            10-2 (aggravated kidnapping),13            10-3 (unlawful restraint),14            10-3.1 (aggravated unlawful restraint),15            11-9.1(A) (permitting sexual abuse of a child). 16            An attempt to commit any of these offenses.17            (iv) A violation of any former law of this State 18        substantially equivalent to any offense listed in 19        clause (2)(i) or (2)(ii) of subsection (d) of this 20        Section.21        (2.5) For the purposes of subsections (b-5) and (b-10) 22    only, a sex offense means:23            (i) A violation of any of the following Sections 24        of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 25        2012:26             10-5(b)(10) (child luring), 10-7 (aiding or   HB1140- 20 -LRB104 04996 RLC 15024 b1        abetting child abduction under Section 10-5(b)(10)), 2        11-1.40 (predatory criminal sexual assault of a 3        child), 11-6 (indecent solicitation of a child), 4        11-6.5 (indecent solicitation of an adult), 11-9.2 5        (custodial sexual misconduct), 11-9.5 (sexual 6        misconduct with a person with a disability), 11-11 7        (sexual relations within families), 11-14.3(a)(1) 8        (promoting prostitution by advancing prostitution), 9        11-14.3(a)(2)(A) (promoting prostitution by profiting 10        from prostitution by compelling a person to be a 11        prostitute), 11-14.3(a)(2)(C) (promoting prostitution 12        by profiting from prostitution by means other than as 13        described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph 14        (2) of subsection (a) of Section 11-14.3), 11-14.4 15        (promoting juvenile prostitution), 11-18.1 16        (patronizing a juvenile prostitute), 11-20.1 (child 17        pornography), 11-20.1B (aggravated child pornography), 18        11-25 (grooming), 11-26 (traveling to meet a minor or 19        traveling to meet a child), or 12-33 (ritualized abuse 20        of a child). An attempt to commit any of these 21        offenses.22            (ii) A violation of any of the following Sections 23        of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 24        2012, when the victim is a person under 18 years of 25        age: 11-1.20 (criminal sexual assault), 11-1.30 26        (aggravated criminal sexual assault), 11-1.60   HB1140- 21 -LRB104 04996 RLC 15024 b1        (aggravated criminal sexual abuse), and subsection (a) 2        of Section 11-1.50 (criminal sexual abuse). An attempt 3        to commit any of these offenses.4            (iii) A violation of any of the following Sections 5        of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 6        2012, when the victim is a person under 18 years of age 7        and the defendant is not a parent of the victim:8            10-1 (kidnapping),9            10-2 (aggravated kidnapping),10            10-3 (unlawful restraint),11            10-3.1 (aggravated unlawful restraint),12            11-9.1(A) (permitting sexual abuse of a child). 13            An attempt to commit any of these offenses.14            (iv) A violation of any former law of this State 15        substantially equivalent to any offense listed in this 16        paragraph (2.5) of this subsection.17        (3) A conviction for an offense of federal law or the 18    law of another state that is substantially equivalent to 19    any offense listed in paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of 20    this Section shall constitute a conviction for the purpose 21    of this Section. A finding or adjudication as a sexually 22    dangerous person under any federal law or law of another 23    state that is substantially equivalent to the Sexually 24    Dangerous Persons Act shall constitute an adjudication for 25    the purposes of this Section.26        (4) "Authorized emergency vehicle", "rescue vehicle",   HB1140- 22 -LRB104 04996 RLC 15024 b1    and "vehicle" have the meanings ascribed to them in 2    Sections 1-105, 1-171.8 and 1-217, respectively, of the 3    Illinois Vehicle Code. 4        (5) "Child care institution" has the meaning ascribed 5    to it in Section 2.06 of the Child Care Act of 1969. 6        (6) "Day care center" has the meaning ascribed to it 7    in Section 2.09 of the Child Care Act of 1969. 8        (7) "Day care home" has the meaning ascribed to it in 9    Section 2.18 of the Child Care Act of 1969.10        (8) "Facility providing programs or services directed 11    towards persons under the age of 18" means any facility 12    providing programs or services exclusively directed 13    towards persons under the age of 18.14        (9) "Group day care home" has the meaning ascribed to 15    it in Section 2.20 of the Child Care Act of 1969. 16        (10) "Internet" has the meaning set forth in Section 17    16-0.1 of this Code. 18        (11) "Loiter" means:19            (i) Standing, sitting idly, whether or not the 20        person is in a vehicle, or remaining in or around 21        school or public park property.22            (ii) Standing, sitting idly, whether or not the 23        person is in a vehicle, or remaining in or around 24        school or public park property, for the purpose of 25        committing or attempting to commit a sex offense.26            (iii) Entering or remaining in a building in or   HB1140- 23 -LRB104 04996 RLC 15024 b1        around school property, other than the offender's 2        residence.3        (12) "Part day child care facility" has the meaning 4    ascribed to it in Section 2.10 of the Child Care Act of 5    1969. 6        (13) "Playground" means a piece of land owned or 7    controlled by a unit of local government that is 8    designated by the unit of local government for use solely 9    or primarily for children's recreation. 10        (14) "Public park" includes a park, forest preserve, 11    bikeway, trail, or conservation area under the 12    jurisdiction of the State or a unit of local government. 13        (15) "School" means a public or private preschool or 14    elementary or secondary school. 15        (16) "School official" means the principal, a teacher, 16    or any other certified employee of the school, the 17    superintendent of schools or a member of the school board.18    (e) For the purposes of this Section, the 500 feet 19distance shall be measured from: (1) the edge of the property 20of the school building or the real property comprising the 21school that is closest to the edge of the property of the child 22sex offender's residence or where he or she is loitering, and 23(2) the edge of the property comprising the public park 24building or the real property comprising the public park, 25playground, child care institution, day care center, part day 26child care facility, or facility providing programs or   HB1140- 24 -LRB104 04996 RLC 15024 b1services exclusively directed toward persons under 18 years of 2age, or a victim of the sex offense who is under 21 years of 3age, to the edge of the child sex offender's place of residence 4or place where he or she is loitering. 5    (f) Sentence. A person who violates this Section is guilty 6of a Class 4 felony.7(Source: P.A. 102-997, eff. 1-1-23.) 8    (720 ILCS 5/11-25)9    Sec. 11-25. Grooming.10    (a) A person commits grooming when he or she knowingly 11uses a computer on-line service, Internet service, local 12bulletin board service, or any other device capable of 13electronic data storage or transmission, performs an act in 14person or by conduct through a third party, or uses written 15communication to seduce, solicit, lure, or entice, or attempt 16to seduce, solicit, lure, or entice, a child, a child's 17guardian, or another person believed by the person to be a 18child or a child's guardian, to commit any sex offense as 19defined in Section 2 of the Sex Offender Registration Act, to 20distribute photographs depicting the sex organs of the child, 21or to otherwise engage in any unlawful sexual conduct with a 22child or with another person believed by the person to be a 23child. As used in this Section, "child" means a person under 17 24years of age. 25    (a-5) Prohibition of plea bargains.  HB1140- 25 -LRB104 04996 RLC 15024 b1        (1) No person charged with grooming shall be permitted 2    to plead down to lesser offenses.3        (2) Prosecutors are prohibited from offering plea 4    bargains to lesser offenses to those individuals charged 5    with grooming. 6    (b) Sentence. Grooming is a Class 4 felony. 7(Source: P.A. 102-676, eff. 6-1-22.)